Massachusetts, session 194th, H753.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subclause:
(w) any policy or report by any city, town, or school district concerning the safety and
security of school buildings and plans for emergency response to active shooter situations.
SECTION 2. Chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 97D the following section:-
Section 97D½. Every city and town in the commonwealth shall establish a special
telephone exchange for the reporting of threats to school buildings, which may be utilized at any
of 3

hour of day or night, and shall widely publicize this number and the protocol for its usage
throughout the city or town.
SECTION 3. Chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby further amended by inserting
after section 98B the following section:-
Section 98B½. (a) In any city or town that accepts the provisions of this section there
shall be a school resource officer, as defined in subsection (a) of section 37P of chapter 71,
assigned to each school building within such city or town, who will be present within the school
building during all regular hours of instruction for the purpose of ensuring school safety and such
other duties as the chief of the police department may otherwise determine from time to time.
The assignment of a school resource officer shall be accompanied by a memorandum of
understanding that shall comply with said section 37P of said chapter 71.
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education shall assist each school
district in applying for any available funds or grants to provide support for target hardening and
other physical security enhancements to school buildings and school property in each school
district of the commonwealth.
SECTION 4. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2C the following section:-
Section 2C½. Each school district in the commonwealth, subject to appropriation and in
coordination with the chief of the local police department, shall implement a specific policy for
the training of students and staff members in the appropriate response to active shooters on
school grounds. Said policy shall include, at a minimum: (i) requirements for regular training
sessions for students and staff in the event of an emergency; (ii) requirements for regular audits
of 3

of school buildings for safety and security by the school district and police department of the
municipality in which the school is located; and (iii) recommendations for making sure every
school building has a single access point, hardened locks and windows and a video surveillance
system monitoring the interior and exterior public areas of the school property and connected to
local police.
Annually, not later than December 31, each school district shall submit a copy of its
policy, together with a report of its activities pursuant to this section, to the department of
elementary and secondary education and the executive office of public safety and security for
their review and comment. Annually, not later than March 1, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall file a report summarizing local compliance with this section with the
clerks of the senate and the house of representatives; provided, that no information regarding
specific plans, procedures or school buildings shall be considered a public record subject to
disclosure, as defined in clause Twenty-Sixth of section 7 of chapter 4.
of 3